Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 3 EMISSIONS INSPECTION
42-4-312. Improper representation as emissions inspection and readjustment station - inspection-only facility - fleet inspection station - motor vehicle dealer test facility - enhanced inspection center.

No person shall in any manner represent any place as an inspection and readjustment station, inspection-only facility, fleet inspection station, motor vehicle dealer test facility, or enhanced inspection center or shall claim to be a licensed emissions inspector or licensed emissions mechanic unless such station, facility, center, or person has been issued and operates under a valid license issued by the department or contract with the state. If the license or contract is cancelled, suspended, or revoked, all evidence designating the station, facility, or center as a licensed inspection and readjustment station, inspection-only facility, fleet inspection station, or motor vehicle dealer test facility or authorized enhanced inspection center and indicative of licensed status of the station, facility, or center or emissions inspector or emissions mechanic shall be removed within five days after receipt of notice of such action.

The department shall have authority to suspend or revoke the inspection and readjustment station license, inspection-only facility license, fleet inspection license, or motor vehicle dealer test facility license or to seek termination of the contractor's contract and require surrender of said license and unused certification of emissions control forms and verification of emissions test forms held by such licensee or contractor when such station, facility, or center is not equipped as required, when such station, facility, or center is not operating from a location for which the license or contract was issued, when the approved location has been altered so that it will no longer qualify as a licensed station or facility or authorized center, or when inspections, repairs, or adjustments are not being made in accordance with applicable laws and the rules and regulations of the department or commission.

The department shall also have authority to suspend or revoke the license of an emissions inspector or emissions mechanic and require surrender of said license when it determines that said inspector or mechanic is not qualified to perform the inspections, repairs, or adjustments or when inspections, repairs, or adjustments are not being made in accordance with applicable laws and the rules and regulations of the department or the commission.

In addition to any other grounds for revocation or suspension, authority to suspend and revoke inspection and readjustment station licenses, inspection-only facility licenses, fleet inspection station licenses, motor vehicle dealer test facility licenses, or enhanced inspection center contracts, or to seek termination of a contractor's contract or an emissions inspector's or emissions mechanic's license and to require surrender of said licenses and unused certification of inspection forms and records of said station shall also exist upon a showing that:

A vehicle which had been inspected and issued a certification of emissions compliance by said station, facility, or center or by said inspector or mechanic was in such condition that it did not, at the time of such inspection, comply with the law or the rules and regulations for issuance of such a certification; or

An inspection and readjustment station, or emissions mechanic has demonstrated a pattern of issuing certifications of emissions waivers to vehicles which, at the time of issuance of such certifications, did not comply with the law or the rules and regulations for issuance of such certifications.

Upon suspending the license of an inspection and readjustment station, inspection-only facility, fleet inspection station, or motor vehicle dealer test facility or an enhanced inspection center contract or of an emissions inspector or emissions mechanic as authorized in this section, the executive director shall immediately notify the licensee or contractor in writing and, upon request therefor, shall grant the licensee or contractor a hearing within thirty days after receipt of such request, such hearing to be held in the county wherein the licensee or contractor resides, unless the executive director and the licensee or contractor agree that such hearing may be held in some other county. The executive director may request a hearing officer to act in the executive director's behalf. Upon such hearing, the executive director or the hearing officer may administer oaths and may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant books, records, and papers. Upon such hearing, the order of suspension or revocation may be rescinded, or, for good cause shown, the suspension may be extended for such period of time as the hearing person or body may determine, not exceeding one year, or the revocation order may be affirmed or reversed. The licensee shall not perform under the license pending the hearing and decision.

Upon the final cancellation or termination of a contractor's contract, the executive director shall invoke the provisions of such contract to continue service until a new contract can be secured with qualified persons as supervised by the department of revenue.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2307, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-314 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-312 was relocated to § 42-4-310.

42-4-313. Penalties.

No person shall make, issue, or knowingly use any imitation or deceptively similar or counterfeit certification of emissions control form.

No person shall possess a certification of emissions control if such person knows the same is fictitious, or was issued for another motor vehicle, or was issued without an emissions inspection having been made when required.

Any person who violates any provision of this subsection (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than ninety days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

No emissions inspector or emissions mechanic shall issue a certification of emissions control for a motor vehicle which does not qualify for the certification or verification issued.

Any emissions inspector or emissions mechanic who issues a certification of emissions control in violation of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than ninety days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

No person shall operate a motor vehicle registered or required to be registered in this state, nor shall any person allow such a motor vehicle to be parked on public property or on private property available for public use, without such vehicle having passed any necessary emissions test. The owner of any motor vehicle that is in violation of this paragraph (a) shall be responsible for payment of any penalty imposed under this section unless such owner proves that the motor vehicle was in the possession of another person without the owner's permission at the time of the violation.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2001, p. 1025

, § 11, effective June 5, 2001.)

Any vehicle owner who violates any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor traffic offense and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of fifty dollars payable within thirty days after conviction.

Any nonowner driver who violates any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor traffic offense and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of fifteen dollars, payable within thirty days after conviction.

The owner or driver may, in lieu of appearance, submit to the court of competent jurisdiction, within thirty days after the issuance of the notice and summons, the certification or proof of mailing specified in this subsection (3).

Any fine collected pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (3) shall be retained by the jurisdiction in whose name such penalty was assessed.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of any municipality, city, county, or city and county to adopt and enforce an ordinance or resolution pertaining to the enforcement of emissions control inspection requirements.

Repealed.

For the emissions program, a contractor who is awarded a contract to perform emissions inspections within the emissions program area shall be held accountable to the department of public health and environment and the department of revenue. Any such contractor shall be subject to civil penalties in accordance with this section or article 7 of title 25, C.R.S., as appropriate, for any violation of applicable laws or rules and regulations of the department of revenue or the commission.

Pursuant to the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., the executive director may suspend for a period not less than six months the license of any operator or employee operating an inspection-only facility, fleet inspection station, or motor vehicle dealer test facility or may impose an administrative fine pursuant to subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b), or may both suspend a license and impose a fine, if any such operator or employee, inspection-only facility, fleet inspection station, or motor vehicle dealer test facility engages in any of the following:

Intentionally passing a failing vehicle;

Performing any test by an unlicensed inspector;

Performing a test on falsified test equipment;

Failing a passing vehicle;

Flagrantly misusing control documents; or

Engaging in a pattern of noncompliance with any regulations of the department of revenue or the commission.

The contract for operation of enhanced inspection centers shall specify administrative fines to be imposed for the violations enumerated in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b).

Pursuant to the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., the executive director shall impose administrative fines in amounts set by the executive director of not less than twenty-five dollars and not more than one thousand dollars against any operator or employee operating an inspection and readjustment station, an inspection-only facility, or a motor vehicle dealer test facility, or any contractor operating an enhanced inspection center or clean screen contractor that engages in two or more incidents per person, station, facility, or center, of any of the following:

Test data entry violations;

Test sequence violations;

Emission retest procedural violations;

Vehicle emissions tag replacement test procedural violations;

Performing any emissions test on noncertified equipment;

Wait-time and lane availability violations;

Physical emissions test examination violations;

Knowingly passing failing vehicles; or

Knowingly failing passing vehicles.

Source:

L. 94:

(4)(a) amended, p. 2813, § 590, effective July 1; entire title amended with relocations, p. 2308, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2001:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (2), (3)(a), (3)(b), (4)(a), and (4)(c) amended, p. 1025, § 11, effective June 5.

L. 2006:

(3)(h), (3)(i), and (3)(j) added, p. 1029, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(3)(h), (3)(i), and (3)(j) repealed, (SB 12-034), ch. 107, p. 365, § 6, effective August 8.

42-4-314. Automobile emissions control systems - tampering - operation of vehicle.

No person shall knowingly disconnect, deactivate, or otherwise render inoperable any air pollution control system which has been installed by the manufacturer of any automobile of a model year of 1968 or later, except to repair or replace a part or all of the system.

No person shall operate on any highway in this state any automobile described in subsection (1) of this section knowing that any air pollution control system installed on such automobile has been disconnected, deactivated, or otherwise rendered inoperable.

A person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section commits a class A traffic infraction and shall be fined thirty-five dollars pursuant to section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(I)(N). The department shall not assess any points under section 42-2-127 for a conviction pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section.

A person who violates subsection (6) of this section commits a class A traffic infraction and shall be fined one hundred dollars pursuant to section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(I)(N). The department shall not assess any points under section 42-2-127 for a conviction pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.

The air quality control commission may adopt rules and regulations pursuant to sections 25-7-109 and 25-7-110, C.R.S., which permit or allow for the alteration, modification, or disconnection of manufacturer-installed air pollution control systems or manufacturer tuning specifications on motor vehicles for the purpose of controlling vehicle emissions. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the alteration or the conversion of a motor vehicle to operate on a gaseous fuel, if the resultant emissions are at levels complying with state and federal standards for that model year of motor vehicle.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the adjustment or modification of motor vehicles to reduce vehicle emissions pursuant to section 215 of the federal "Clean Air Act", as amended, 42 U.S.C. sec. 7549.

Nuisance exhibition of motor vehicle exhaust - prohibition. A person shall not engage in a nuisance exhibition of motor vehicle exhaust, which is the knowing release of soot, smoke, or other particulate emissions from a motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of fourteen thousand pounds or less into the air and onto roadways, other motor vehicles, bicyclists, or pedestrians, in a manner that obstructs or obscures another person's view of the roadway, other users of the roadway, or a traffic control device or otherwise creates a hazard to a driver, bicyclist, or pedestrian.

The prohibition set forth in subsection (6)(a) of this section does not apply to:

A commercial vehicle, as defined in section 42-1-102 (17.5);

A common carrier, as defined in section 40-1-102 (3)(a)(I);

A motor carrier, as defined in section 40-10.1-101 (10);

A motor carrier of passengers, permitted pursuant to section 40-10.1-302;

A motor carrier of towed motor vehicles, permitted pursuant to section 40-10.1-401;

A motor carrier of household goods, permitted pursuant to section 40-10.1-502;

A motor vehicle used for agricultural purposes; or

Any other vehicle used for commercial activities.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2311, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2017:

(3) amended and (6) added, (SB 17-278), ch. 323, p. 1742, § 1, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1210 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-314 was relocated to § 42-4-312.

42-4-315. Warranties.

No provision of sections 42-4-301 to 42-4-316 shall be deemed to prevent, or interpreted so as to hinder, the enforcement of any applicable motor vehicle part or emissions control systems performance warranty.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2311, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-315.5 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-315 was relocated to § 42-4-313.

42-4-316. AIR program - demonstration of compliance with ambient air quality standards and transportation conformity.

If the commission and the lead air quality planning agency of any portion of the program area agree that it has been demonstrated that any portion of the program meets ambient air quality standards and transportation conformity requirements, in compliance with federal acts, the commission may specify that the AIR program will no longer apply in that portion of the program area.

The legislative audit committee shall cause to be conducted performance audits of the program, including the clean screen program. The audits must be completed not later than January 1, 2018, and January 1 of each fifth year thereafter. Upon completion of the audit report, the legislative audit committee shall hold a public hearing to review the report.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2001, p. 1022

, § 9, effective June 5, 2001.)

In such audits, the determination as to whether an ongoing public need for the program has been demonstrated shall take into consideration the following factors, among others:

The demonstrable effect on ambient air quality of the program;

The cost to the public of the program;

The cost-effectiveness of the program relative to other air pollution control programs;

The need, if any, for further reduction of air pollution caused by mobile sources to attain or maintain compliance with national ambient air quality standards;

The application of the program to assure compliance with legally required warranties covering air pollution control equipment.

Source:

L. 94:

(3)(a) amended, p. 2813, § 591, effective July 1; entire title amended with relocations, p. 2311, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 98:

(1), (2), and (3)(a) amended, p. 894, § 6, effective May 26.

L. 2001:

(2), (3)(a), and IP(3)(b) amended, p. 1022, § 9, effective June 5.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 871, § 7, effective August 7.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 1029, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(2) amended, (HB 14-1176), ch. 135, p. 466, § 1, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (3)(a) by House Bill 94-1029 were harmonized with Senate Bill 94-001.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2001 act amending subsections (2) and (3)(a) and the introductory portion to subsection (3)(b), see section 1 of chapter 278, Session Laws of Colorado 2001. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2006 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 225, Session Laws of Colorado 2006.

42-4-316.5. Termination of vehicle emissions testing program.

The commission shall have the authority to eliminate all requirements for regularly scheduled basic or enhanced emissions inspections of motor vehicles if the commission finds that this action does not violate federal air quality standards.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1029, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (SB 12-034), ch. 107, p. 365, § 7, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

As of publication date, the air quality control commission has made no determination as to whether the elimination of all requirements for regularly scheduled basic or enhanced emissions inspections of motor vehicles violates federal air quality standards.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2006 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 225, Session Laws of Colorado 2006.

42-4-317. Purchase or lease of new motor vehicles by state agencies - clean-burning alternative fuels - definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2312, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

Subsection (9) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1995. (See

L. 94, p. 2312

.)